tr_test.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ѕ mek tireyim [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirici [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirildik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirildik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirildiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirildikçe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebildik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebildik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebildiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebildikçe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilebilirlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilebilirlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilebilirliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilecakken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilecek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilecek/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebileceğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebileli [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilemeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilen [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilen/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilerek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilerken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilesi [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilesi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilici [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilince [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilip [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilirken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilirlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilirlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilirliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebiliş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebiliş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilme [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilme/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmek/ЙЦъТшѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmeksizin [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmeyinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmez [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmez/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmezken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmişlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmişlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilebilmişliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilecakken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilecek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilecek/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirileceğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirileli [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemedik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemedik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemediğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemedikçe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememe/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememek/ЙЦъТшѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememeksizin [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememeyinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememez [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememez/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememezken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememişlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememişlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilememişliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyebilirlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyebilirlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyebilirliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyecakken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyecek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyecek/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyeceğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyeli [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyemeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyen [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyen/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyerek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyerken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyesi [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyesi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyici [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyince [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyip [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyirken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilemeyiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilen [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilen/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilerek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilerken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilesi [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilesi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilici [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilince [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilip [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilirken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tiriliş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tiriliş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilme [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilme/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmedik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmedik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmediğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmedikçe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmek/ЙЦъТшѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeksizin [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeme [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeme/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemek/ЙЦъТшѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemeksizin [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemeyinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemez [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemez/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemezken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemişlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemişlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmemişliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyebilirlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyebilirlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyebilirliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyecakken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyecek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyecek/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyeceğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyeli [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyemeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyen [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyen/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyerek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyerken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyesi [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyesi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyici [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyince [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyip [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyirken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmeyiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmez [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmez/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmezken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmişlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmişlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilmişliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemedik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemedik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemediğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemedikçe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememe [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememe/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememeden [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememek [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememek/ЙЦъТшѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememeksizin [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememeyinceye [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememez [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememez/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememezken [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememiş [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememişlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememişlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyememişliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemeyebilirlik [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemeyebilirlik/ЦъТшйѧ [çfhkpsşt]mek
SFX ѕ mek tirilyemeyebilirliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ [çfhkpsşt]mek
