tr_test.dic
kökenlenmek/ѕ
elenmek/ѕ
yekinmek/ѕ
yükümlenmek/ѕ
değil/ѕ
merkezlenmek/ѕ
yermek/ѕ
seslenmek/ѕ
vazgeçirmek/ѕ
denşirmek/ѕ
becelleşmek/ѕ
sertlenmek/ѕ
vermek/ѕ
emdirmek/ѕ
dilenmek/ѕ
peşrevlenmek/ѕ
eğirmek/ѕ
dehşetlenmek/ѕ
kütletmek/ѕ
pürtüklenmek/ѕ
içirmek/ѕ
esermek/ѕ
eğilmek/ѕ
deyivermek/ѕ
kesişmek/ѕ
pürçeklenmek/ѕ
dilmek/ѕ
çöreklenmek/ѕ
ikirciklenmek/ѕ
kemirmek/ѕ
adçektirmek/ѕ
erinleşmek/ѕ
iyeşmek/ѕ
mühhemleşmek/ѕ
sikişmek/ѕ
vazgelmek/ѕ
abandırabilmek/ѕ
aceleleştirmek/ѕ
adayabilmek/ѕ
affolunabilmek/ѕ
aksettirmek/ѕ
akıtabilmek/ѕ
alevlendirmek/ѕ
alçalıvermek/ѕ
alışılagelmek/ѕ
anlaşılabilmek/ѕ
anıtlaşabilmek/ѕ
arsızlaşabilmek/ѕ
asfaltlanabilmek/ѕ
asıvermek/ѕ
atılabilmek/ѕ
avuçlayıvermek/ѕ
aydınlatıvermek/ѕ
ayırabilmek/ѕ
azımsanabilmek/ѕ
ağartabilmek/ѕ
aşabilmek/ѕ
bahsedebilmek/ѕ
bandırabilmek/ѕ
bastırabilmek/ѕ
bağdaştırılabilmek/ѕ
bağışlatabilmek/ѕ
bebekleşmek/ѕ
bekletilmek/ѕ
belgeleyivermek/ѕ
belirsizleşebilmek/ѕ
belletilmek/ѕ
benimsetilebilmek/ѕ
bereketlenebilmek/ѕ
besteletmek/ѕ
bezebilmek/ѕ
bildirilmek/ѕ
bilgilendirilebilmek/ѕ
bilinçlendirmek/ѕ
binivermek/ѕ
birleşilebilmek/ѕ
bitişebilmek/ѕ
biçimlendirilmek/ѕ
bocalatabilmek/ѕ
borçlandırabilmek/ѕ
bozdurulabilmek/ѕ
boğuluvermek/ѕ
budanabilmek/ѕ
bulaştırıvermek/ѕ
buluşulabilmek/ѕ
buruşturabilmek/ѕ
bölümlendirmek/ѕ
bükebilmek/ѕ
bütünleşmek/ѕ
büzülüvermek/ѕ
bıçaklayabilmek/ѕ
cazibeleştirmek/ѕ
cennetleşmek/ѕ
ciltletmek/ѕ
cömertleşebilmek/ѕ
dalgınlaşabilmek/ѕ
danışabilmek/ѕ
dayanılabilmek/ѕ
dağıtıvermek/ѕ
deldirtmek/ѕ
demirlenmek/ѕ
demokratikleştirebilmek/ѕ
deneyebilmek/ѕ
denkleştirilebilmek/ѕ
derecelendirebilmek/ѕ
derlenmek/ѕ
destelenmek/ѕ
devleşebilmek/ѕ
devşirtmek/ѕ
değersizleşmek/ѕ
değiştirmeksizin/ѕ
dikenleşmek/ѕ
dilendirilmek/ѕ
dinamitlenmek/ѕ
dinlenilmek/ѕ
dipçikletmek/ѕ
diyecek/ѕ
dizilebilmek/ѕ
dogmalaştırılabilmek/ѕ
doluvermek/ѕ
doğurabilmek/ѕ
dökebilmek/ѕ
dönüşüvermek/ѕ
düzelebilmek/ѕ
düzleşmek/ѕ
düşürüvermek/ѕ
edilgenleştirmek/ѕ
efsaneleştirmek/ѕ
eklenmek/ѕ
elemesiz/ѕ
emilmek/ѕ
engelleyebilmek/ѕ
eritivermek/ѕ
erteletebilmek/ѕ
eskitilmek/ѕ
eterleştirmek/ѕ
etkisizleştirmek/ѕ
evlenebilmek/ѕ
ezberletebilmek/ѕ
eğdirtmek/ѕ
eşekleşmek/ѕ
eştirmek/ѕ
fethettirmek/ѕ
formülleştirmek/ѕ
galvanizletmek/ѕ
geciktirebilmek/ѕ
gemlenmek/ѕ
gençleştirilmek/ѕ
gerileyebilmek/ѕ
geveleyivermek/ѕ
geçerlenmek/ѕ
geçirtilmek/ѕ
giderivermek/ѕ
giydirmek/ѕ
gölgelenmek/ѕ
gönüllendirmek/ѕ
görünebilmek/ѕ
göstertmek/ѕ
gözleyebilmek/ѕ
güdükleşmek/ѕ
gümrüklendirmek/ѕ
günülenmek/ѕ
güzelleşmek/ѕ
haczedilmek/ѕ
hançerletmek/ѕ
hatırlanabilmek/ѕ
haşlayabilmek/ѕ
hibritleşmek/ѕ
homojenleşmek/ѕ
hızlanabilmek/ѕ
iletilebilmek/ѕ
iliştirilebilmek/ѕ
imzalatabilmek/ѕ
incitebilmek/ѕ
inleyebilmek/ѕ
isimleştirmek/ѕ
istifletmek/ѕ
iyileştirmek/ѕ
içirebilmek/ѕ
iğrenilmek/ѕ
işlenebilmek/ѕ
kabarıvermek/ѕ
kaldırılıvermek/ѕ
kanserleşmek/ѕ
kapılıvermek/ѕ
karışıvermek/ѕ
katılabilmek/ѕ
kaybedilmek/ѕ
kayıvermek/ѕ
kelepçelenmek/ѕ
kerpiçleşmek/ѕ
kesiştirmek/ѕ
keşfettirmek/ѕ
kitaplaştırabilmek/ѕ
klorürleştirmek/ѕ
konuluvermek/ѕ
kristallenmek/ѕ
kusturabilmek/ѕ
körükleyebilmek/ѕ
küreselleşebilmek/ѕ
kılıvermek/ѕ
kıskandırabilmek/ѕ
lifleşmek/ѕ
melezleşmek/ѕ
modernleşebilmek/ѕ
nankörleşmek/ѕ
nitelendirilmek/ѕ
oluşturabilmek/ѕ
paketletilmek/ѕ
pekişilmek/ѕ
pinekletmek/ѕ
proleterleşmek/ѕ
resimlendirmek/ѕ
sahneletilmek/ѕ
saplanabilmek/ѕ
savuşuvermek/ѕ
sepetlenmek/ѕ
sersemleşmek/ѕ
sevecenleştirmek/ѕ
sezdirilmek/ѕ
silikleştirmek/ѕ
sislendirmek/ѕ
sordurtabilmek/ѕ
sömürebilmek/ѕ
sümsükleştirmek/ѕ
süslenmek/ѕ
sıçrayabilmek/ѕ
tanıyabilmek/ѕ
tazeletmek/ѕ
tellenmek/ѕ
termikleştirmek/ѕ
tizleştirmek/ѕ
töreleşmek/ѕ
türküleştirmek/ѕ
uyabilmek/ѕ
uçabilmek/ѕ
verilmek/ѕ
yakınabilmek/ѕ
yapıştırabilmek/ѕ
yayabilmek/ѕ
yelelenmek/ѕ
yetinebilmek/ѕ
yitirilmek/ѕ
yutuvermek/ѕ
yükselebilmek/ѕ
yıkanabilmek/ѕ
ziyadeleşmek/ѕ
çalıştırabilmek/ѕ
çağdaşlaştırabilmek/ѕ
çekiçletmek/ѕ
çeneleşmek/ѕ
çevrilmek/ѕ
çirkefleşmek/ѕ
çiçeklendirmek/ѕ
çökeltmez/ѕ
çözündürebilmek/ѕ
çıtlatıvermek/ѕ
ölçebilmek/ѕ
örgütlenebilmek/ѕ
özelleştirmek/ѕ
öğretilmek/ѕ
ütüleyebilmek/ѕ
şekerlenmek/ѕ
şükrettirmek/ѕ
işlevlendirmek/ѕ
